Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB753.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3019(b), (d) and (f) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3019. Victim protection during prosecution.* * *(b) Affirmative defense.--[An individual who is charged with any violation under section 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses) may offer the defense at trial that he engaged in the conduct charged because he was compelled to do so by coercion or the use of or a threat to use unlawful force against his person or the person of another, which a person of reasonable firmness in his situation would have been unable to resist.] A victim of human trafficking has an affirmative 1234567891011121314151617 defense for an offense committed as a direct result of the human trafficking without regard to whether any person was prosecuted or convicted for the human trafficking violation.* * *(d) Motion to vacate conviction.--(1) An individual convicted under section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass), 3922 (relating to theft by deception), 3929 (relating to retail theft), 4105 (relating to bad checks), 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct), 5506 (relating to loitering and prowling at night time), 5507 (relating to obstructing highways and other public passages) or 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses) or an offense for simple possession of a controlled substance or an order of contempt under 42 Pa.C.S. § 4132 (relating to attachment and summary punishment for contempts) resulting from any of the above committed as a direct result of being a victim of human trafficking may file a motion to vacate the conviction.(2) In order to be considered, a motion under this subsection must:(i) Be in writing.(ii) [Be consented to by] Provide proof of notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth.(iii) Describe the supporting evidence with particularity.(iv) Include copies of any documents showing that the moving party is entitled to relief under this section.* * *(f) Grant of motion.--The court shall grant the motion if it 20250HB0753PN0777 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 finds that:(1) The moving party was convicted of an offense described in subsection (d)(1).(2) The moving party demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that the conviction was obtained as a result of the moving party's having been a victim of human trafficking.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0753PN0777 - 3 - 12345678